District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.03d

Rapid Housing Program assistance.

(a)

The Agency shall track and publicly report the number of emancipating youth and families who apply for or are referred for assistance under the Rapid Housing Program, the number of youth and families who are eligible for assistance, and the number of youth and families who receive assistance.

(b)

The Agency shall maintain a waiting list of emancipating youth and families who are eligible but cannot receive assistance due to insufficient funds.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, § 303d
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5181, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 36, 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 2-22, § 303x as D.C. Law 2-22, § 303d.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5181 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5181 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5180 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle S of title V of the act may be cited as the “Child and Family Services Rapid Housing Assistance Amendment Act of 2009”.